District of Columbia statutes.
44-1102.07

Repealed

Transfer of functions to the Corporation.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-212, § 207, 43 DCR 4962
Oct. 8, 1997, D.C. Law 12-43, § 2(b), 44 DCR 5763
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 801, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 55, 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-265, § 5, 46 DCR 2096
Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1602(a), 46 DCR 6373
July 12, 2001, D.C. Law 14-18, § 9(a), 48 DCR 4047
1981 Ed., § 32-262.7.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 801 of Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Temporary Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-59, March 20, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 2094).
For temporary addition of chapter, see note to § 44-1101.01.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 801 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-152, October 17, 1997, 44 DCR 6196), and see § 801 of the Fiscal Year 1998 Revised Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-239, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 508).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(b) of the CFO Membership on the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Board, Council Review of Board promulgations, and conditional Approval of Organizational and Operational Plan Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-137, September 30, 1997, 44 DCR 5765), and see § 2(b) of the CFO Membership on the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Board, Council Review of Board Promulgations, and Conditional Approval of Organizational and Operational Plan Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-242, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 638).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4 of the Establishment of Council Contract Review Criteria and Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-47, April 6, 1999, 46 DCR 5481).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1602(a) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 44-1102.07a, see § 2 of the District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-454, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9413).

Review and approval of the Organizational and Operational Plan for the D.C. Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation: For approval of the Organizational and Operational Plan for the District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation, on an emergency basis; provided, that the Chief Financial Officer certifies that the Organizational and Operational Plan is consistent with the District of Columbia Financial Plan and Budget, see § 3 of the CFO Membership on the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Board, Council review of Board Promulgations, and Conditional Approval of Organizational and Operational Plan Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-137, September 30, 1997, 44 DCR 5765), and see § 3 of the CFO Membership on the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Board, Council Review of Board Promulgations, and Conditional Approval of Organizational and Operational Plan Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-242, January 13, 1998, 45 DCR 638).

Approval of Organizational and Operational Plan: Section 3 of D.C. Law 12-43 provided that the Council has reviewed and approves the Organizational and Operational Plan for the District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation; provided, that the Chief Financial Officer certifies that the Organizational and Operational Plan is consistent with the District of Columbia Financial Plan and Budget.

District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Independent Personnel Regulations Approval Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution PR 12-695, deemed approved on June 19, 1998, the Council approved the proposed Independent Personnel Regulation, recommended by the Board of Directors of the PBC and transmitted to Council on March 23, 1998.

District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Independent Personnel Regulations Approval Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution PR 12-696, effective June 19, 1998, the Council approved the Independent Personnel Regulations submitted by the District of Columbia Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation (PBC).